California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
In proceedings for annexation to sewer, lighting, or drainage maintenance districts, the board of supervisors shall direct its clerk to publish a notice once a week for two successive weeks in the newspaper of general circulation that the board deems most likely to give notice of hearing to the inhabitants. Such notice shall state the time and place of the hearing and shall contain a description of the territory proposed to be annexed or, in lieu of such description, the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed may be shown by means of a diagram. Such publication together with the posting of notices of hearing may be deemed adequate notice and no mailed notice need be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 968.)
-------------------------------------------

5839.

At the time fixed for the hearing or to which it may be continued, the board of supervisors shall hear and pass upon the proposal and any objections which may be filed to the inclusion of any property within the proposed annexation.

The board of supervisors may, by order entered upon its minutes, determine that such territory or any part thereof may be annexed to the district and may order that the boundaries of the district be altered to include such territory if one or more of the following facts exist:

(a) The territory to be annexed will be benefited by annexation.

(b) The annexation will allow economies and efficiencies in the administration or operation of an existing lighting system in the territory to be annexed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

5840.

If any portion of the territory annexed to a maintenance district comprises a portion of another maintenance district formed under the provisions of this chapter, a highway lighting district organized pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 19000) of Division 14, or a sewer maintenance district formed under the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4860), Part 3, Division 5 of the Health and Safety Code, the annexation of such territory shall not become complete unless and until any outstanding contract of the other district of which such territory is a part has expired or such contract, with the consent of the parties thereto, has been modified or canceled so as to relieve the other district of further obligation to pay for future contract obligations within the portion of the territory so withdrawn, and the funds of such other district remaining on hand upon the completion of such annexation shall have been apportioned between the maintenance district to which the territory was annexed and the other district from which it was withdrawn. The division of such funds shall be prorated in the proportion that the assessed value of the real property of the territory so withdrawn bore to the total assessed value of the real property within the district prior to such withdrawal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

5841.

If the territory annexed to a maintenance district includes within its boundaries all of another maintenance district formed under the provisions of this chapter, a highway lighting district organized pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 19000) of Division 14, or a sewer maintenance district formed under the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4860), Part 3, Division 5 of the Health and Safety Code, upon such annexation becoming complete by the adoption of the order of the board of supervisors, the prior existing district so annexed shall thereupon be dissolved. Any funds of the district remaining on hand at the time of the annexation shall be transferred to the maintenance district to which such territory is annexed and any contracts or obligations of the previously existing district shall become the obligations of the maintenance district to which it is annexed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

5841.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subsequent to annexation of such territory and dissolution of the annexed district, the maintenance district shall assume all of the assets and liabilities of the dissolved district and shall be entitled to all of the property tax revenues to which the territory annexed would have been entitled had the territory not been so annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

5842.

If, after the formation of a maintenance district, additional improvements of the same type or nature are constructed within the boundaries of such district, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention that the cost of maintaining and operating such additional improvements shall be borne by the existing maintenance district. It shall fix a time and place for a hearing on such resolution, at which hearing any and all persons having any objections to the things proposed to be done may appear and be heard. The resolution shall contain a statement of the estimated annual cost of maintaining and operating such additional improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5843.

Notice of the hearing on the resolution shall be given to the persons within the existing maintenance district in the manner prescribed by Section 5838. Mailed notice shall be required with respect to additional improvements for a lighting maintenance district where the annual cost to such district of such additional improvements is more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). At the hearing the board of supervisors shall hear and pass upon any and all protests to the maintaining and operating of such additional improvements by the existing maintenance district and its decision shall be final and conclusive. At the conclusion of the hearing the board of supervisors may by order, entered upon its minutes, make the expenses of maintaining and operating such additional improvements a charge upon the existing maintenance district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

5843.5.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the board of supervisors, upon its own motion or upon receipt of a petition signed by 20 or more taxpayers of an existing lighting maintenance district asking for the installation and maintenance of additional lights, may, by order entered upon its minutes, make the expenses of the installation and maintenance of the additional lights a charge upon the existing district if the board determines that it will be just and equitable, and in the public interest for the additional cost, if any, to be paid by the district as a whole. If sufficient funds are available or will be available from a tax levy already made or after the tax levy has been made, the board may proceed with the installation of the additional lights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 766.)
-------------------------------------------

5844.

Any portion of any maintenance district which will not be benefited by remaining within the district, may be withdrawn therefrom. The board of supervisors may by resolution entered upon its minutes fix a time for a hearing on the question of the withdrawal of any portion of a maintenance district which will not be benefited by remaining within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.

The time for the hearing shall be not less than 10 nor more than 30 days after the date of the adoption of the resolution. The board of supervisors shall at least five days prior to the time so fixed cause a notice of such hearing to be published by one insertion in such daily, weekly or semiweekly newspaper printed, published and circulated in the county, as the board deems most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the district of the proposed withdrawal. Copies of the notice also shall be posted at least one week prior to the date fixed for the hearing in three conspicuous places within that portion of the maintenance district sought to be withdrawn and in three conspicuous places within the remaining portion of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5846.

Any person interested may appear at the hearing and object to the withdrawal of said portion from the maintenance district, or may object to the continuance of the remaining territory as a maintenance district. The board of supervisors shall consider and pass upon all objections and if it finds that the portion of the district sought to be withdrawn will not be benefited by remaining within the maintenance district and that the remaining territory not sought to be withdrawn will be benefited by continuing as a maintenance district, then it shall order such withdrawal and the continuance of the remaining territory as a maintenance district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5847.

No withdrawal of territory under the provisions of Section 5846 or 5853 shall become effective unless and until any outstanding contract of the maintenance district from which a portion is sought to be withdrawn has expired, or such contract, with the consent of the parties thereto, has been modified or canceled so as to relieve such maintenance district of further obligation to pay for future maintenance within the territory so withdrawn.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

5847.5.

Any maintenance district created to finance any work which might also be constructed or maintained by a county sanitation district, may become a part of a county sanitation district after the board of supervisors of the county within which the maintenance district is located has, after a hearing held pursuant to the County Sanitation District Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4700), Part 3, Division 5 of the Health and Safety Code), determined by resolution that such inclusion is for the best interest of the maintenance district and the governing body of the maintenance district consents to the inclusion by resolution adopted by the affirmative vote of a majority of its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1319.)
-------------------------------------------

5847.6.

A maintenance district included in a county sanitation district pursuant to Section 5847.5 is not dissolved by such inclusion, but may continue to function in the same manner that it functioned before the inclusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1319.)
-------------------------------------------

5848.

Any maintenance district may be dissolved by the board of supervisors. The board of supervisors upon its own motion may adopt a resolution declaring its intention to dissolve the maintenance district and may fix a time for a hearing upon such dissolution. The time for such hearing shall be not less than 10 days nor more than 30 days after the date of the adoption of such resolution, and the clerk of the board of supervisors shall, at least 15 days prior to the time so fixed, publish notice of such hearing by one insertion in a daily, weekly or semiweekly newspaper printed, published and circulated in the county, and cause printed copies of such notice to be posted in three conspicuous places within the maintenance district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.

At the time appointed for such hearing, or at any time to which it is adjourned, the board of supervisors shall hear and pass upon the question of dissolution and all objections and protests and may grant or deny the same, and its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive. If the board of supervisors upon such hearing determines that the maintenance district shall be dissolved, the board of supervisors shall, by resolution, order the dissolution of the district and the district shall thereupon be dissolved. The maintenance and operation of the improvements of such district may be continued thereafter until the funds collected for the purpose of maintaining and operating them have been expended for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5850.

Upon the inclusion of all of the territory of a maintenance district within one or more cities, either by reason of annexation proceedings or by reason of the incorporation of one or more cities, and upon dissolution of such district, all funds paid into the county treasury to the credit of such district shall be paid over by the board of supervisors of such district as prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

5851.

If the whole district is so included within one city, the district shall continue in existence for all purposes until a copy of a resolution adopted by the city requesting dissolution of the district or requesting transfer of jurisdiction over the district and the funds of the district to the city is filed with the board of supervisors whereupon the district shall be dissolved or jurisdiction over the district shall be transferred by resolution of the board of supervisors to the city, as requested by the resolution adopted by the city, and such funds shall be paid to the treasurer of that city and administered by the legislative body of the city for the benefit of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1727.)
-------------------------------------------

5852.

If a part only of the district is so included within one city and the remaining part of the district is so included within one or more other cities, so that no portion of the district remains within unincorporated territory of the county, the district shall continue in existence for all purposes until a copy of a joint resolution adopted by all of the cities requesting dissolution of the district is filed with the board of supervisors whereupon the district shall be dissolved. The proportionate part of such funds shall be paid to the treasurer of each such city as the assessed valuation of the real property of the portion of the district included therein bore, before being so included, to the total assessed valuation of the real property of the district, and such funds shall be administered by the legislative bodies of such cities for the benefit of the district. Any one city may withdraw its territory from the district in the manner provided by Section 5853.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

5853.

Whenever any portion of a district is included within a city by reason of incorporation, annexation, or otherwise, such portion shall continue to remain a part of the district for all purposes until a copy of a resolution adopted by the city requesting exclusion of such territory from the district is received by the board of supervisors. Upon the withdrawal of any territory of a district, all property acquired for the district and all unencumbered funds on the date of withdrawal, including all taxes levied and collected by the district in any year in which taxes are levied and collected by the district after the date of withdrawal on property withdrawn from the district, shall be divided between the city and the remaining district in proportion to the assessed value of the real property of the territory so withdrawn and the portion remaining. For the purpose of this article, the unencumbered funds are the sum of money, uncollected taxes, and other uncollected amounts belonging to or due such district, in excess of an amount sufficient to pay all claims and accounts against the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 771.)
-------------------------------------------

5854.

The board of supervisors may by resolution change the name of any maintenance district to conform with a change in the street name or other designation which the district bears. The clerk of the board of supervisors shall file in the office of the county assessor and with the State Board of Equalization a certified copy of every such resolution, and upon such filing the name of the district shall be changed for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 729.)
-------------------------------------------

5855.

Where the board of supervisors or legislative body has so declared in its resolution of intention to order the formation of a maintenance district or any annexation thereto, the board of supervisors or legislative body may, in its resolution ordering the formation of a maintenance district or any annexation thereto, order the district divided into tax assessment zones. Tax assessment zones may be formed at a time other than at the formation of the district or any annexation thereto if pursuant to the same procedure of resolution, notice, and hearing as are applicable under this chapter to the annexation of territory.

No district shall be divided into zones unless the board of supervisors or legislative body finds that a tax assessment zone requires special services or special facilities in addition to those provided generally by the maintenance district or the replacement of obsolete equipment, and that the tax levy is commensurate with the special benefits to be provided in the zone. The boundaries of tax assessment zones may be changed or a zone may be dissolved in the same manner that a zone may be formed in an existing district.

When a zone is formed for the purpose of the construction or installation of special facilities in addition to those provided generally by the district or to replace obsolete equipment, the board of supervisors or legislative body may provide at the time of formation for the automatic dissolution of the zone upon payment of all assessments attributable to the special facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

5856.

If a maintenance district is divided into zones, the board of supervisors or legislative body may determine what portion of the amount of money to be secured from the levy of taxes shall be secured from each zone within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 748.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 27. Construction of Sidewalks and Curbs [5870. - 5895.54.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5870. - 5873.]

5870.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Block” means property facing one side of any street between the next intersecting streets or between the terminus of a dedicated right-of-way of a street and an intersecting street. “Street” does not include an alley or other right-of-way unless it is of the same width as a regular residential minimum-width street approved as part of a master plan of circulation or streets by the governmental agency involved. In the case of an alley, “block” means property facing both sides of any alley between the next intersecting streets or alleys, or between the terminus of an alley and an intersecting street. In the case of street lighting, “block” means property facing the side of any street on which the improvement is to be constructed between the next intersecting streets on the side to be improved or between the terminus of a dedicated right-of-way of a street and a street intersecting the side to be improved; or property facing the side of any street on which the improvement is to be constructed between the next intersecting streets on the side to be improved or between the terminus of a dedicated right-of-way of a street and a street intersecting the side to be improved and the property facing the opposite side of the street.

Where a “block” exceeds 1,000 feet in length, a length of frontage of 1,000 feet constitutes a “block” as used in this chapter, if so designated by the superintendent of streets. A determination by the superintendent of streets of such a 1,000-foot block establishes a “block” and cannot later be changed to include a portion of said 1,000-foot “block” in another “block.”

(b) “Driveway” means a paved portion of a public street providing an unobstructed passage from the roadway to an offstreet area used for driving, servicing, parking, or otherwise accommodating motor vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 153.)
-------------------------------------------

5871.

(a) This chapter applies to the construction of sidewalks, gutters, pavements, driveways, and curbs, and the installation of storm and sanitary drainage facilities, water mains, pipes, conduits, tunnels, hydrants, and other necessary works and appliances for providing water service, parkway trees, and street lighting facilities in front of properties in any block where a sidewalk, gutter, pavement, driveway, the installation of storm and sanitary sewer drainage facilities, water mains, pipes, conduits, tunnels, hydrants, and other necessary works and appliances for providing water service, parkway trees, and street lighting facilities, or curb, or all of them, have been previously constructed in front of properties in the block constituting more than 50 percent of the front footage of the block, or where the owners of more than 60 percent of the front footage of the block, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the city, file a petition with the city clerk requesting the installation of any of those improvements, or where a petition signed by the owners of more than 60 percent of the front footage of any part of an unimproved portion or portions of a block has been filed with the city clerk requesting the installation of those improvements in front of that part.

(b) This chapter does not apply to the construction of improvements of the type specified in subdivision (a) fronting on, or otherwise adjacent to, or in conjunction with, an arterial or collector street section. For purposes of this section, an “arterial or collector street section” is a street section with more than one traffic lane in each direction either before or after the proposed improvement, or a street section on which more than 70 percent of the average daily vehicle trips do not originate or end within the proposed assessment district. 

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), this chapter applies to the construction of sidewalks, curbs, and gutters appurtenant thereto, sufficient paving to provide a parking lane, and to parkway trees and street lighting facilities, but only to the extent that those improvements are in front of the property on arterial or collector street sections, which is otherwise subject to assessment, if the property has not been subject to any other special assessment to pay for construction of sidewalks, curbs, gutters, parking lane paving, parkway trees, or street lighting facilities within the preceding 10 years. As used in this subdivision, “gutters” shall include only above-ground structures appurtenant to sidewalks and curbs.

As used in this subdivision, “parking lane” means a paved area adjacent to the curb which is used exclusively for on-street parking. It does not include any portion of the street used for through traffic or as a bicycle lane. An assessment for parking lane purposes shall not include the cost of any signs necessitated by the parking lane. If property is assessed for a parking lane pursuant to this chapter and the parking lane is subsequently converted to another use, the amount of the assessment paid, together with interest at the prime rate plus 3 percent, shall be paid by the city to the then owner of the property.

(d) This chapter does not apply to driveway construction in front of a vacant lot, or in front of an unimproved property, unless requested by the owner.

(e) This chapter does not apply to the repair, resurfacing, or maintenance of streets.

(f) As used in this chapter, “sidewalks or curbs” includes “gutters,” “driveways,” “pavement” to the centerline of the street, “full pavement” in alleys, “storm and sanitary drainage facilities,” “water mains,” “pipes,” “ conduits,” “tunnels,” “hydrants,” and “other necessary works and appliances for providing water service,” “paving to provide a parking lane on arterial or collector street sections,” “parkway trees,” and “street lighting facilities;” and “superintendent of streets” includes any other person or persons who may be designated by the legislative body to perform any of the duties of the superintendent of streets set forth in this chapter.

(g) “Fronting” and “facing,” as used in this chapter, means “abutting” in the case of property adjoining an alley improvement.

(h) In the case of street lighting, in determining how much of the front footage of a block has been improved, the front footage of property benefiting from existing installations may be included regardless of the side of the street on which the installation has been constructed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 449, Sec. 2.   Effective July 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

5872.

This chapter constitutes a separate and alternative procedure for performing the work specified herein, and except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no other provision of this division, excepting definitions, shall apply to proceedings instituted hereunder. Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5220) applies to any proceedings taken under this chapter. The “Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protection Act of 1931” does not apply to proceedings taken under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 449, Sec. 3.   Effective July 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

5873.

As used in this chapter, “cost,” “construction cost,” or variants thereof, means and includes both the actual cost of construction of the work and any incidental expenses, as defined in Section 5024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1837.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Performing the Work [5875. - 5883.]

5875.

The owners of lots or portions of lots fronting on any public street or place when that street or place has been improved by the construction of sidewalks or curbs for a total frontage of more than fifty percent (50%) on one side of such street or place in any block, or where a petition signed by the owners of more than sixty percent (60%) of the front footage of the block has been filed with the city clerk requesting the installation of such improvements, or where a petition signed by the owners of more than sixty percent (60%) of the front footage of any part of an unimproved portion or portions of a block has been filed with the city clerk requesting the installation of such improvements in front of said part, or whenever the legislative body of the city upon its own motion orders the installation of such improvements in front of said part, shall have the duty of constructing or causing the construction of sidewalks or curbs in front of their properties upon notice so to do by the superintendent of streets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

5876.

When the superintendent of streets finds that sidewalks or curbs have been constructed, or that their construction has been guaranteed to his satisfaction, in front of properties constituting more than fifty percent (50%) of the frontage in any block, or where a petition signed by the owners of more than sixty percent (60%) of the front footage of the block has been filed with the city clerk requesting the installation of such improvements, or where a petition signed by the owners of more than sixty percent (60%) of the front footage of any part of an unimproved portion or portions of a block has been filed with the city clerk requesting the installation of such improvements in front of said part, or whenever the legislative body of the city upon its own motion has ordered the installation of such improvements in front of said part, said superintendent of streets may, and upon the instructions of the legislative body of the city shall, notify the owner or person in possession of the property fronting on that portion of the street in such block in which no sidewalks or curbs have been constructed theretofore, to construct or cause to be constructed sidewalks or curbs in front of his property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

5877.

Notice to construct may be given by delivering a written notice personally to the owner or to the person in possession of the property facing upon the sidewalks or curbs to be constructed or by mailing a postal card, postage prepaid, to the person in possession of such property, or to the owner thereof at his last known address as the same appears on the last equalized assessment rolls of such city or to the name and address of the person owning such property as shown in the records of the office of the clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1837.)
-------------------------------------------

5878.

The postal card shall contain a notice to construct the sidewalks or curbs as the case may be, and the superintendent of streets shall, immediately upon the mailing of the notice, cause a copy thereof, printed on a card of not less than 8 inches by 10 inches in size, to be posted in a conspicuous place on the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1837.)
-------------------------------------------

5878.1.

The notice shall also specify the day, hour, and place when the legislative body will hear and pass upon objections or protests, if any, which may be raised by any property owner or other interested persons, but in no case shall the hearing be sooner than 10 days after giving of notice. Upon the day and hour fixed for the hearing, the legislative body shall hear and pass upon objections or protests in accordance with Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5220).

The hearing required by this section is in addition to the hearing required by Section 5881.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 449, Sec. 4.   Effective July 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

5879.

The notice shall particularly specify what work is required to be done, and how it is to be done, and what materials shall be used in the construction and shall further specify that if the construction is not commenced within 60 days after notice is given and diligently and without interruption prosecuted to completion, the superintendent of streets shall cause the construction to be done, and the cost of the same shall be a lien on the property. However, upon petition by all of the affected property owners, the 60-day period may be waived and the superintendent of streets may immediately cause the construction to be done, and the cost of the same shall be a lien upon the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1826.)
-------------------------------------------

5879.1.

The legislative body may adopt a resolution determining that bonds shall be issued and assessments collected and enforced pursuant to Part 5 of this division. In such event, the notice shall also specify that bonds shall be issued to represent the security of the unpaid assessments, payable over a period of not to exceed 10 years, and shall further recite a maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 7 percent a year, payable semiannually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 986.)
-------------------------------------------

5880.

If the construction is not commenced and prosecuted to completion with due diligence, as required by the notice or by the legislative body after the hearing required by Section 5878.1 of this chapter, the superintendent of streets shall forthwith construct the sidewalks or curbs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1837.)
-------------------------------------------

5881.

Upon the completion of the construction, the superintendent of streets shall cause notice of the cost of the construction to be given in the manner specified in this article for the giving of notice to construct, which notice shall specify the day, hour and place when the legislative body will hear and pass upon a report by the superintendent of streets of the cost of the construction, together with any objections or protests, if any, which may be raised by any property owner liable to be assessed for the cost of such construction and any other interested persons. In no case shall the hearing provided for in this section be sooner than 10 days after giving of notice. If bonds are to be issued, the notice shall also contain the information required by Section 5879.1.

The cost of the construction may include a proportionate share, as determined by the legislative body, of the cost of improvements constructed in a place other than in front of a parcel of property which are required for the proper functioning of the improvements in front of the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

5882.

Upon the completion of the construction, the superintendent of streets shall prepare and file with the legislative body a report specifying the work which has been done, the cost of construction, a description of the real property in front of which the work has been done and the assessment against each lot or parcel of land proposed to be levied to pay the cost or portion thereof. The report may include work done in front of any number of parcels of property, whether contiguous to each other or not. In determining the amount of the assessment against each lot or parcel of land, the superintendent shall assess the same portion of the total cost of the work against each lot or parcel as that parcel will receive of the total benefit from the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 449, Sec. 5.   Effective July 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

5883.

Upon the day and hour fixed for the hearing the legislative body shall hear and pass upon the report of the superintendent of streets, together with any objections or protests which may be raised by any of the property owners liable to be assessed for such construction and any other interested persons. Thereupon the legislative body may make such revision, correction or modifications in the report as it may deem just, after which, by motion or resolution, the report as submitted, or as revised, corrected or modified, shall be confirmed. The legislative body may adjourn the hearings from time to time. The decisions of the legislative body on all protests and objections which may be made, shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Collection of Cost of Construction [5890. - 5895.1.]

5890.

The assessments proposed by the superintendent of streets pursuant to Section 5882, as may be amended by the legislative body during the hearing held pursuant to Section 5883, may be confirmed and levied by the legislative body against the parcels of property fronting upon the sidewalks or curbs so constructed, and the cost so assessed, if not paid within five days after its confirmation by the legislative body, shall constitute a special assessment against each of those parcels, and shall be a lien on the property for the amount thereof from the time of recordation of the notice of lien, which lien shall continue until the
 assessment and all interest thereon is paid, or until it is discharged of record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 449, Sec. 6.   Effective July 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

5890.5.

In assessing land, credit may be given for dedications and for improvements constructed at private expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 739.)
-------------------------------------------

5891.

The superintendent of streets may file in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the parcel of property is located, a certificate substantially in the following form, to wit:

Notice of Lien

Pursuant to the authority vested in me by the Improvement Act of 1911, I did, on the ____ day of ____, 20__, cause the sidewalk or curb to be constructed, and the legislative body of said city (county, or city and county) did, on the ____ day of ____, 20__, by Resolution No. ____ assess the cost of such construction upon the real property hereinafter described, and the same has not been paid nor any part thereof,
 and the said city (county, or city and county), does hereby claim a lien on said real property in the sum of ____ dollars ($____), and the same shall be a lien upon said real property until the said sum, with interest at the rate of ____ percent (insert rate of interest as fixed by legislative body, not to exceed 6 percent) per annum, from the said ____ day of ____, 20__, (insert date of the thirty-first day after confirmation of assessment), has been paid in full and discharged of record.

The real property hereinbefore mentioned and upon which a lien is claimed, is that certain piece or parcel of land lying and being in the (name of city, or city and county) the County of ____, State of ____, and particularly described as follows, to wit:

(Description of Property)
Dated this _____ day of ____, 20__.Superintendent of Streets

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 10.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5892.

From and after the date of the recording of the notice of lien, all persons shall be deemed to have had notice of the contents thereof. The notice of lien may include claims against one or more separate parcels of property, whether contiguous or not, together with the amount due, respectively, from each such parcel. The statute of limitation shall not run against the right of the city to enforce the payment of the lien. If any such lien is not paid the city may file and maintain an action to foreclose such lien in the same manner and under the same procedure, so far as applicable, as that under which delinquent bonds are foreclosed under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

5893.

As an alternative method of collection of the amount of the lien, the legislative body, after confirmation of the report of the superintendent of streets, may order the notice of lien to be turned over to the accounting officer and the tax collector of the city, whereupon it shall be the duty of those officers to add the amount of the assessment to the next regular bill for taxes levied against the lot or parcel of land. If city taxes are collected by the county officials, the notice of lien shall be delivered to the county auditor, who shall enter the amount thereof on the county assessment book opposite the description of the particular property and the amount shall be
 collected together with all other taxes thereon against the property. The notice of lien shall be delivered to the county auditor before the date fixed by law for the delivery of the assessment book to the county board of equalization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

5894.

Thereafter the amount of the lien shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as ordinary city taxes are collected, and shall be subject to the same penalties and interest and to the same procedure under foreclosure and sale in case of delinquency as provided for ordinary city taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of city taxes and county taxes are hereby made applicable to such special assessment taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

5895.
